Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.45.080

Partnership between community and technical colleges and campuses.

The state board for community and technical colleges and the student achievement council shall adopt performance measures to ensure a collaborative partnership between the community and technical colleges and the campuses created under this chapter. The partnership shall be one in which the community and technical colleges prepare students for transfer to the upper-division programs of the campuses and the campuses work with community and technical colleges to enable students to transfer and obtain degrees efficiently.

[ 2017 c 52 s 10; 2012 c 229 s 535; 2004 c 57 s 5; 1989 1st ex.s. c 7 s 8. Formerly RCW 28B.80.510.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Legislative findings—1989 1st ex.s. c 7: See RCW 28B.45.010.